Illinois, session 104th, HB5297.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-172 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)7    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 8Homestead Exemption. 9    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 10Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.11    (b) As used in this Section:12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Section.14    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 15of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 16value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 17value of the residence after the base year.18    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 19year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 20the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 21property was improved with a permanent structure that was 22occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 23paying real property taxes on the property and who was either   HB5297- 2 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 2equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 3instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 4lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 5residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 6applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 7equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 8equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 9that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 10value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 11property that reduces the assessed value for one or more 12taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 13the base year until a new base year is established under the 14terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 15County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years 16for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 17exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 18officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 19lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 20that is based on an assessed value that results from a 21temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 22assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 23considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 24year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 25thereafter until a new base year is established under the 26terms of this paragraph.  HB5297- 3 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 2Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 3the property is located.4    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 5equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.6    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 7applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 8applicant as their principal place of residence.9    "Household income" means the combined income of the 10members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 11taxable year. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 12beginning in taxable year 2027, if an applicant or a member of 13the applicant's household incurs qualified medical expenses in 14the taxable year and withdraws moneys from a tax-deferred 15account, including, but not limited to, a retirement account 16or a health savings account, to pay those qualified medical 17expenses, then the applicant may apply to the chief county 18assessment officer to deduct those amounts from the 19applicant's household income for the purpose of determining 20eligibility for the exemption under this Section. 21    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 22of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 23Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 242001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits. 25    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 26Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws   HB5297- 4 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 2preceding the taxable year.3    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 4a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities 5Act.6    "Maximum income limitation" means:7        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;8        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;9        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;10        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;11        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 12        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 13    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 14    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 15    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; 16        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2025, $65,000 for 17    all qualified property; 18        (8) for taxable year 2026, $75,000 for all qualified 19    property;20        (9) for taxable year 2027, $77,000 for all qualified 21    property; and 22        (10) for taxable years 2028 and thereafter, $79,000 23    for all qualified property. 24    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 25enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 26have household income that does not exceed the maximum income   HB5297- 5 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid 2to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the 3Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 4which are administered by the Department of Human Services; 5the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 6is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 8by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 9Estate Tax Deferral Program. 10    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 11she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 12exemption but may not report which program or programs, if 13any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 14submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 15unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 16Information Act. 17    "Qualified medical expense" has the meaning given to that 18term in Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code. 19    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 20appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 21State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 22and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 23upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 24residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 25has established a specific legal description for a portion of 26property constituting the residence, then that portion of   HB5297- 6 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 2this Section.3    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 4valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 5levied.6    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior 7citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 8real property that is improved with a permanent structure that 9is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 10of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 11income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, 12(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 13property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 14a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 15written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 16to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 17permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 18occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 19or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 20that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 21a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 22lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 23taxes on that property. 24    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 25of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized 26assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which   HB5297- 7 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1application is made minus the base amount. In all other 2counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 3through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and 4thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the 5equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 6for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii) 7for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 8follows:9        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 10    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 11    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable 12    year for which application is made minus the base amount.13        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 14    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of 15    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 16    residence in the taxable year for which application is 17    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.18        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 19    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 20    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 21    residence in the taxable year for which application is 22    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.23        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 24    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 25    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 26    residence in the taxable year for which application is   HB5297- 8 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.2        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 3    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of 4    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 5    residence in the taxable year for which application is 6    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2. 7    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 8for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption 9under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 10amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 11the prior year.12    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 13to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 14shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of 15improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 16were added after the base year for this parcel and that 17increased the assessed value of the property.18    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 19owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 20life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 21maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 22property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 23for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 24(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 25does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is 26liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for   HB5297- 9 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 2owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 3cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold 4interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead 5exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 6association or its management firm shall credit the savings 7resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 8liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any 9person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 10owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 11misdemeanor.12    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 13Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 14licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 15Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 16Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 17the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 18years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 19the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 20unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 21homestead exemption.22    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 23would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 24the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 25exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section 26shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year   HB5297- 10 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 2except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 3qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those 4years.5    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 6exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 7one of such persons and for only one residence.8    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than 93,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 10shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 11County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 12is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 13for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 14receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to 15the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 16property is located during such period as may be specified by 17the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 18Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 19inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 20period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 213,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 22thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 23application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 24Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 25located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for 26submission of applications that is different than July 1. The   HB5297- 11 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 2the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 3(and if married the name and address of the applicant's 4spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of 5the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 6shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy 7of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 8Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any 9taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 10that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 11application shall contain or be verified by a written 12declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 13taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 14perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 152012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 16for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 17Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 18receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 19County Assessment Officer.20    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 21counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 22applicant fails to file the application required by this 23Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 24mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 25render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a 26timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend   HB5297- 12 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 2regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 3may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the 4original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension 5provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 6Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from 7the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 8or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 9condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 10registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 11condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 12incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 13the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 14file the application.15    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 16provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 173,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 18application required by this Section in a timely manner and 19this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 20sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 21filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 22Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 23of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 24paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 25Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the 26applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or   HB5297- 13 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 2condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 3registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 4condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 5incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.6    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 7applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 8denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment 9official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 10taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 11determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather 12than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 13exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 14of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995 15as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 16(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 17taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 18as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 19erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.20    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 21of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 22apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 23Application shall be made during the application period in 24effect for the county of his or her residence. 25    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the 26eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a   HB5297- 14 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 2by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 3questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure 4that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 5by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 6each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer 7may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 8credited that exemption.9    Except as provided in this Section, all information 10received by the chief county assessment officer or the 11Department from applications filed under this Section, or from 12any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 13Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 14or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State 15or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 16sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 17imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 18information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 19judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.20    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 21Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 22making available reasonable statistics concerning the 23operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 24the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 25way that information contained in any individual claim shall 26not be disclosed.  HB5297- 15 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 2year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater 4of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under 5this Section or (ii) $2,000. 6    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 7chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 8the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 9that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 10year, provided that: 11        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 12    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 13    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 14        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 15    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 16    as of January 1, 2019; 17        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 18    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 19    this Code; and 20        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 21    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 22    taxable years. 23    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 24authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 25audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 26Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the   HB5297- 16 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 2    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 3chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 4the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 5that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 6year, if:7        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 8    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 9    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;10        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 11    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 12    as of January 1, 2020;13        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 14    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 15    this Code; and16        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 17    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 18    taxable years.19    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 20authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 21audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 22Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 23exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 24    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 25publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 26under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60   HB5297- 17 -LRB104 17568 HLH 30996 b1days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 2application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 3Officer of the county in which the property is located. The 4notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 5the county.6    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 7Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 8implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 9(Source: P.A. 104-452, eff. 12-12-25.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.